Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2303.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 90A.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. âKickboxing matchâ means a professional or amateur kickboxing match or event that is open to the public and an admission fee is charged, a donation is requested from those in attendance, or merchandise or refreshments are available for purchase. Sec. 2. Section 90A.1, subsection 9, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . d. Organizes, holds, advertises, or otherwise conducts a kickboxing match. Sec. 3. Section 90A.2, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. A person shall not act as a promoter of a professional boxing or wrestling match , or a mixed martial arts match , or a kickboxing match without first obtaining a license from the commissioner. This subsection shall not apply to a person distributing a closed-circuit, pay-per-view, or similarly distributed signal to a person acting as a promoter or to a person viewing the signal in a private residence. Sec. 4. Section 90A.6, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: House File 2303, p. 2 The commissioner may suspend, deny, revoke, annul, or withdraw a license, registration, or authority to participate in a professional boxing or wrestling match , or mixed martial arts match , or kickboxing match if any of the following occur: Sec. 5. Section 90A.9, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. The promoter of a professional boxing or wrestling match or event , or a mixed martial arts match , or a kickboxing match shall, within twenty days after the match or event, furnish to the commissioner a written report stating the number of tickets sold, the gross amount of admission proceeds of the match or event, and other matters the commissioner may prescribe by rule. The value of complimentary tickets in excess of five percent of the number of tickets sold shall be included in the gross admission receipts. Within twenty days of the match or event, the promoter shall pay to the treasurer of state a tax of five percent of its total gross admission receipts, after deducting state sales tax, from the sale of tickets of admission to the match or event. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2303, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor